Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1281.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 707.1. Expedited High Density Housing Approval.--(a) 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 No later than one year after the effective date of this subsection, the board shall adopt rules requiring the governing body of a municipality to issue a land use decision, notwithstanding any comprehensive plan or land use regulations or Statewide land use planning goals IN COMPLIANCE WITH EXISTING COMPREHENSIVE PLANS OR MUNICIPAL LAND USE REGULATIONS OR STATEWIDE LAND USE PLANNING GOALS , approving the development of specified residential development types on certain lots or parcels under specified conditions under this section.(b) A rule established under this section shall only apply to lots or parcels that are zoned residential and served by public utilities.(c) The residential development types that may be approved under this section shall only include:(1) Attached or detached housing, including accessory dwelling units, prefabricated or modular housing or mixed use with residential.(2) Types with a buildable area of:(i) A size of not more than 2,200 square feet for a single-unit dwelling, accessory dwelling unit, duplex, triplex, quadplex or townhouse.(ii) An average per-unit size of not more than 1,400 square feet for cottage clusters or a multiunit dwelling.(3) A multiunit dwelling with fewer than 50 units.(4) Housing that complies with the maximum density requirements of the applicable comprehensive plan or land use regulations for the lot or parcel.(5) Housing types whose building plans have been approved under subsection (f).(d) The board may specify for the approved residential 20260SB1281PN1760 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 development types allowed under this section:(1) Processes that the municipalities may apply to the development, except for public facilities or traffic impact analysis processes, which the municipality may establish and implement.(2) Applicable design standards and the scope of the design review, which may include requiring the approval of the use of any material, design or method of construction that is approved under the applicable building code or approved under subsection (f).(3) Allowable variations or adjustments, or variation or adjustment types, from the specific approval. A municipality is not required to grant a request for adjustments to development authorized under this section except as specified by the board.(e) (1) In adopting rules under this section, the board shall coordinate with the review of building construction plans by the department under subsection (f).(2) In implementing this section, the department shall coordinate with approvals of land use plans by the board under this section.(f) The department shall designate a process by which an applicant for a building permit for a residential structure of a type described in subsection (c)(1), (2) and (3) may receive building construction plan approval from the municipality, including through the use of:(1) Typical drawings and specifications created by the department.(2) Review of plans and specifications approved by the department. Plans and specifications submitted under this 20260SB1281PN1760 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paragraph shall remain proprietary unless the submitter requests otherwise.(g) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." The State Planning Board under section 451 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town or township.SECTION 2. NOTHING IN THIS ACT SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO AUTHORIZE APPROVAL OF A RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENT TYPE UNDER THE ADDITION OF SECTION 707.1 OF THE ACT UNLESS THE DEVELOPMENT COMPLIES WITH THE APPLICABLE ZONING ORDINANCE OR LAND USE REGULATION OF THE MUNICIPALITY.Section 2 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1281PN1760 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718